North Carolina statutes. Chapter 166A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
Article 1A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
§ 166A-19.20.
Gubernatorial or legislative declaration of state of emergency. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Declaration. — A state of emergency may be declared by the Governor or by a resolution of the General Assembly, if either of these finds that an emergency exists.

Emergency Area. — An executive order or resolution declaring a state of emergency shall include a definition of the area constituting the emergency area.

Expiration of States of Emergency. — A state of emergency declared pursuant to this section shall expire when it is rescinded by the authority that issued it.

Exercise of Powers Not Contingent on Declaration of Disaster Type. — Once a state of emergency has been declared pursuant to this section, the fact that a declaration of disaster type has not been issued shall not preclude the exercise of powers otherwise conferred during a state of emergency.

Extra Session; Emergency Transportation Expenditures. — The General Assembly considers a determination by the Secretary of Transportation under

G.S. 136-44.2

E(f) that anticipated emergency expenses will exceed the funds in the Transportation Emergency Reserve within the meaning of the term “extraordinary occasions,” and therefore the Governor is authorized to convene the General Assembly in Extra Session under Section 5(7) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution. The General Assembly strongly urges the Governor to convene the General Assembly in Extra Session within 14 days of notice by the Secretary under

G.S. 136-44.2

E(f) for the purpose of appropriating funds from the Savings Reserve to the Emergency Reserve to address the transportation needs of the State necessitated by a major disaster.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 4; 1955, c. 387, s. 4; 1959, c. 284, s. 2; c. 337, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, ss. 11, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 181(a); 1995, c. 509, s. 125; 2001-214, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2020-91, s. 4.7(c).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 166A-19.20

.

§ 166A-19.20.
Gubernatorial or legislative declaration of state of emergency. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Declaration. — A state of emergency may be declared by the Governor or by a resolution of the General Assembly, if either of these finds that an emergency exists.

Emergency Area. — An executive order or resolution declaring a state of emergency shall include a definition of the area constituting the emergency area.

Expiration of States of Emergency. — A state of emergency declared pursuant to this section shall expire as follows:

If not a statewide emergency area, when it is rescinded by the authority that issued it.

If a statewide emergency area, 30 calendar days after issuance without a concurrence of the Council of State. A declaration of emergency may not be continued without the concurrence of the Council of State. If the Council of State concurs with the declaration of emergency, the declaration of emergency shall expire 60 calendar days after issuance, unless the General Assembly extends the declaration of emergency by enactment of a general law. If the General Assembly does not extend the declaration of emergency by enactment in accordance with this subdivision, the Governor shall not issue a substantially similar declaration of emergency arising from the same events that formed the basis to issue the initial declaration of emergency that was not extended.

(c1)

Effect of Failure of Concurrence of the Council of State. —

If the concurrence of the Council of State fails with the issuance or continuation of a declaration of emergency under subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the Governor shall not issue the same or any other substantially similar declarations of emergency based on the same emergency.

(c2)

Multiple Declarations to Avoid Concurrence of Council of State. —

If the Governor declares more than one state of emergency based on the same emergency that would extend the application of the emergency area, when combined, to more than two-thirds of the counties in the State, the Governor shall obtain the concurrence of the Council of State in accordance with subdivision (c)(2) of this section for each declaration of emergency.

Exercise of Powers Not Contingent on Declaration of Disaster Type. — Once a state of emergency has been declared pursuant to this section, the fact that a declaration of disaster type has not been issued shall not preclude the exercise of powers otherwise conferred during a state of emergency.

Extra Session; Emergency Transportation Expenditures. — The General Assembly considers a determination by the Secretary of Transportation under

G.S. 136-44.2

E(f) that anticipated emergency expenses will exceed the funds in the Transportation Emergency Reserve within the meaning of the term “extraordinary occasions,” and therefore the Governor is authorized to convene the General Assembly in Extra Session under Section 5(7) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution. The General Assembly strongly urges the Governor to convene the General Assembly in Extra Session within 14 days of notice by the Secretary under

G.S. 136-44.2

E(f) for the purpose of appropriating funds from the Savings Reserve to the Emergency Reserve to address the transportation needs of the State necessitated by a major disaster.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 4; 1955, c. 387, s. 4; 1959, c. 284, s. 2; c. 337, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, ss. 11, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 181(a); 1995, c. 509, s. 125; 2001-214, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2020-91, s. 4.7(c); 2021-180, s. 19E.6(b).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered
G.S 166A-19.20.

§ 166A-19.21.
Gubernatorial disaster declaration.

Preliminary Damage Assessment. — When a state of emergency is declared pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.20

, the Secretary shall provide the Governor and the General Assembly with a preliminary damage assessment as soon as the assessment is available.

Declaration of Disaster. — Upon receipt of a preliminary damage assessment, the Governor is authorized to issue a disaster declaration declaring the impact or anticipated impact of the emergency to constitute a disaster of one of the following types:

Type I disaster. — A Type I disaster may be declared by the Governor prior to, and independently of, any action taken by the Small Business Administration, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, or any other federal agency, if all of the following criteria are met:

A local state of emergency has been declared pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.22

and a written copy of the declaration has been forwarded to the Governor.

The preliminary damage assessment meets or exceeds the criteria established for the Small Business Administration Disaster Loan Program pursuant to 13 C.F.R. Part 123 or meets or exceeds the State infrastructure criteria set out in G.S. 166A-19.41(b)(2)a.

A major disaster declaration by the President of the United States pursuant to the Stafford Act has not been declared.

Type II disaster. — A Type II disaster may be declared if the President of the United States has issued a major disaster declaration pursuant to the Stafford Act. The Governor may request federal disaster assistance under the Stafford Act without making a Type II disaster declaration.

Type III disaster. — A Type III disaster may be declared if the President of the United States has issued a major disaster declaration under the Stafford Act and either of the following is true:

The preliminary damage assessment indicates that the extent of damage is reasonably expected to meet the threshold established for an increased federal share of disaster assistance under applicable federal law and regulations.

The preliminary damage assessment prompts the Governor to call a special session of the General Assembly to establish programs to meet the unmet needs of individuals, businesses, or political subdivisions affected by the emergency.

Expiration of Disaster Declarations. —

Expiration of Type I disaster declarations. — A Type I disaster declaration shall expire 60 days after its issuance unless renewed by the Governor or the General Assembly. Such renewals may be made in increments of 30 days each, not to exceed a total of 120 days from the date of first issuance. The Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations shall be notified prior to the issuance of any renewal of a Type I disaster declaration.

Expiration of Type II disaster declarations. — A Type II disaster declaration shall expire twelve months after its issuance unless renewed by the Governor or the General Assembly. Such renewals may be made in increments of three months each. A Type II disaster declaration and any renewals of that declaration shall not exceed a total of 24 months. The Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations shall be notified prior to the issuance of any renewal of a Type II disaster declaration.

Expiration of Type III disaster declarations. — A Type III disaster declaration shall expire 24 months after its issuance unless renewed by the General Assembly.

Expiration of disaster declarations declared prior to July 1, 2001. — Any state of disaster declared or proclaimed before July 1, 2001, irrespective of type, shall terminate by a declaration of the Governor or resolution of the General Assembly. A declaration or resolution declaring or terminating a state of disaster shall be disseminated promptly by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the general public and, unless the circumstances attendant upon the disaster prevent or impede, promptly filed with the Secretary, the Secretary of State, and the clerks of superior court in the area to which it applies.

Effect of Disaster Declaration Expiration. — Expiration of a Type II or III disaster declaration shall not affect the State’s obligations under federal-State agreements entered into prior to the expiration of the disaster declaration.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 4; 1955, c. 387, s. 4; 1959, c. 284, s. 2; c. 337, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, ss. 11, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 181(a); 1995, c. 509, s. 125; 2001-214, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2012-90, ss. 7, 8.

§ 166A-19.22.
Municipal or county declaration of state of emergency.

Declaration. — A state of emergency may be declared by the governing body of a municipality or county, if either of these finds that an emergency exists. Authority to declare a state of emergency under this section may also be delegated by ordinance to the mayor of a municipality or to the chair of the board of county commissioners of a county.

Emergency Area. — The emergency area shall be determined in accordance with the following:

Unless another subdivision of this subsection is applicable, the emergency area shall not exceed the area over which the municipality or county has jurisdiction to enact general police-power ordinances. The governing body declaring the state of emergency may declare that the emergency area includes part or all of the governing body’s jurisdiction. Unless the governing body declaring the state of emergency provides otherwise, the emergency area includes this entire jurisdiction, subject to the limitations contained in the other subdivisions in this subsection.

The emergency area of a state of emergency declared by a county shall not include any area within the corporate limits of any municipality, or within any area of the county over which a municipality has jurisdiction to enact general police-power ordinances, unless the municipality’s governing body or mayor consents to or requests the state of emergency’s application. Such an extension may be with respect to one or more of the prohibitions and restrictions imposed in that county pursuant to the authority granted in

G.S. 166A-19.31

and need not be with respect to all prohibitions and restrictions authorized by that section.

The board of commissioners or chair of the board of commissioners of any county who has been requested to do so by a mayor may by declaration extend the emergency area of a state of emergency declared by a municipality to any area within the county in which the board or chair determines it to be necessary to assist in the controlling of the emergency within the municipality. The extension may be with respect to one or more of the prohibitions and restrictions imposed in that mayor’s municipality pursuant to the authority granted in

G.S. 166A-19.31

and need not be with respect to all prohibitions and restrictions authorized by that section. Extension of the emergency area pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to the following additional limitations:

The extension of the emergency area shall not include any area within the corporate limits of a municipality, or within any area of the county over which a municipality has jurisdiction to enact general police-power ordinances, unless the mayor or governing body of that other municipality consents to its application.

A chair of a board of county commissioners extending the emergency area under the authority of this subdivision shall take reasonable steps to give notice of its terms to those likely to be affected.

The chair of the board of commissioners shall declare the termination of any prohibitions and restrictions extended pursuant to this subdivision upon the earlier of the following:

The chair’s determination that they are no longer necessary.

The determination of the board of county commissioners that they are no longer necessary.

The termination of the prohibitions and restrictions within the municipality.

The powers authorized under this subdivision may be exercised whether or not the county has enacted ordinances under the authority of G.S. 166A-19.31. Exercise of this authority shall not preclude the imposition of prohibitions and restrictions under any ordinances enacted by the county under the authority of G.S. 166A-19.31.

Expiration of States of Emergency. — Unless an ordinance adopted pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.31

provides otherwise, a state of emergency declared pursuant to this section shall expire when it is terminated by the official or governing body that declared it.

Effect of Declaration. — The declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to this section shall activate the local ordinances authorized in

G.S. 166A-19.31

and any and all applicable local plans, mutual assistance compacts, and agreements and shall also authorize the furnishing of assistance thereunder.

History.

Former G.S. 14-288.13; 1969, c. 869, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 195; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c). Former G.S. 14-288.14; 1969, c. 869, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 196; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 7; c. 24, s. 14(c). Former G.S. 166A-8; 1951, c. 1016, s. 6; 1953, c. 1099, s. 4; 1957, c. 950, s. 2; 1959, c. 337, s. 5; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 734, ss. 12, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.23.
Excessive pricing prohibitions.

A declaration issued pursuant to this Article shall trigger the prohibitions against excessive pricing during states of disaster, states of emergency, or abnormal market disruptions pursuant to

G.S. 75-37

and

G.S. 75-38

.

History.

2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.24.
Remote meetings during certain declarations of emergency.

Remote Meetings. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon issuance of a declaration of emergency under

G.S. 166A-19.20

, any public body within the emergency area may conduct remote meetings in accordance with this section and Article 33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes throughout the duration of that declaration of emergency. Compliance with this statute establishes a presumption that a remote meeting is open to the public.

Requirements. — The public body shall comply with all of the following with respect to remote meetings conducted under this section:

The public body shall give proper notice under

G.S. 143-318.12

and under any other requirement for notice applicable to the public body. The notice shall also specify the means by which the public can access the remote meeting as that remote meeting occurs.

Any member of the public body participating by a method of simultaneous communication in which that member cannot be physically seen by the public body must identify himself or herself in each of the following situations:

When the roll is taken or the remote meeting is commenced.

Prior to participating in the deliberations, including making motions, proposing amendments, and raising points of order.

Prior to voting.

All documents to be considered during the remote meeting shall be provided to each member of the public body.

The method of simultaneous communication shall allow for any member of the public body to do all of the following:

Hear what is said by the other members of the public body.

Hear what is said by any individual addressing the public body.

To be heard by the other members of the public body when speaking to the public body.

All votes shall be roll call; no vote by secret or written ballots, whether by paper or electronic means or in accordance with G.S. 143-318.13(b), may be taken during the remote meeting.

The public body shall comply with G.S. 143-318.13(c).

The minutes of the remote meeting shall reflect that the meeting was conducted by use of simultaneous communication, which members were participating by simultaneous communication, and when such members joined or left the remote meeting.

All chats, instant messages, texts, or other written communications between members of the public body regarding the transaction of the public business during the remote meeting are deemed a public record.

The remote meeting shall be simultaneously streamed live online so that simultaneous live audio, and video, if any, of such meeting is available to the public. If the remote meeting is conducted by conference call, the public body may comply with this subdivision by providing the public with an opportunity to dial in or stream the audio live and listen to the remote meeting.

(b1)

If a public body has provided notice of an official meeting and one or more of the members of the public body desire to participate remotely after the issuance of the notice, the public body may amend the notice of the meeting to include the means whereby the public can access the remote meeting as that remote meeting occurs. Such amended notice of remote meeting shall comply with all of the following:

(1)

Be issued no less than six hours prior to the official meeting.

(2)

Be distributed in accordance with

G.S. 143-318.12

(b)(2) and (b)(3), as applicable.

(3)

Be posted in accordance with G.S. 143-318.12(e).

Quorum. — A member of the public body participating by simultaneous communication under this section shall be counted as present for quorum purposes only during the period while simultaneous communication is maintained for that member. The provisions of

G.S. 153A-44

and

G.S. 160A-75

shall apply to all votes of each member of a county or municipal governing board taken during a remote meeting.

Voting by Members of the Public Body. — Votes of each member of a public body made during a remote meeting under this section shall be counted as if the member were physically present only during the period while simultaneous communication is maintained for that member.

Public Hearings. — A public body may conduct any public hearing required or authorized by law during a remote meeting, and take action thereon, provided the public body allows for written comments on the subject of the public hearing to be submitted between publication of any required notice and 24 hours prior to the scheduled time for the beginning of the public hearing.

Quasi-Judicial Hearings. — A public body may conduct a quasi-judicial proceeding as a remote meeting only when all of the following apply:

The right of an individual to a hearing and decision occur during the emergency.

All persons subject to the quasi-judicial proceeding who have standing to participate in the quasi-judicial hearing have been given notice of the quasi-judicial hearing and consent to the remote meeting.

All due process rights of the parties affected are protected.

Closed Sessions. — The public body may conduct a closed session as authorized in

G.S. 143-318.11

. While in closed session, the public body is not required to provide access to the remote meeting to the public.

Not Exclusive. — This section applies only during emergency declarations and does not supersede any authority for electronic meetings under Article 33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Definitions. — For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

Official meeting. — As defined in G.S. 143-318.10(d).

Public body. — As defined in G.S. 143-318.10(b) and (c).

Remote meeting. — An official meeting, or any part thereof, with between one and all of the members of the public body participating by simultaneous communication.

Simultaneous communication. — Any communication by conference telephone, conference video, or other electronic means.

History.

2020-3, s. 4.31(a); 2021-35, s. 1.

§§ 166A-19.25 through 166A-19.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Additional Powers During States of Emergency.

§ 166A-19.30.
Additional powers of the Governor during state of emergency. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the Governor by law, during a gubernatorially or legislatively declared state of emergency, the Governor shall have the following powers:

To utilize all available State resources as reasonably necessary to cope with an emergency, including the transfer and direction of personnel or functions of State agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency services.

To take such action and give such directions to State and local law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this Article and with the orders, rules, and regulations made pursuant thereto.

To take steps to assure that measures, including the installation of public utilities, are taken when necessary to qualify for temporary housing assistance from the federal government when that assistance is required to protect the public health, welfare, and safety.

Subject to the provisions of the State Constitution to relieve any public official having administrative responsibilities under this Article of such responsibilities for willful failure to obey an order, rule, or regulation adopted pursuant to this Article.

Through issuance of an executive order to waive requirements for an environmental document or permit issued under Articles 1, 4, and 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes for the repair, protection, safety enhancement, or replacement of a component of the State highway system that provides the sole road access to an incorporated municipality or an unincorporated inhabited area bordering the Atlantic Ocean or any coastal sound where bridge or road conditions as a result of the events leading to the declaration of the state of emergency pose a substantial risk to public health, safety, or welfare. The executive order shall list the duration of the waiver and the activities to which the waiver applies. For purposes of this subdivision, “coastal sound” shall have the definition set forth in

G.S. 113A-103

, and “replacement” shall not be interpreted to exclude a replacement that increases size or capacity or that is located in a different location than the component that is replaced.

During a gubernatorially or legislatively declared state of emergency, with the concurrence of the Council of State, the Governor has the following powers:

To direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the State, to prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation; and to control ingress and egress of an emergency area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein.

To establish a system of economic controls over all resources, materials, and services to include food, clothing, shelter, fuel, rents, and wages, including the administration and enforcement of any rationing, price freezing, or similar federal order or regulation.

To regulate and control the flow of vehicular and pedestrian traffic, the congregation of persons in public places or buildings, lights and noises of all kinds, and the maintenance, extension, and operation of public utility and transportation services and facilities.

To waive a provision of any regulation or ordinance of a State agency or a political subdivision which restricts the immediate relief of human suffering.

To perform and exercise such other functions, powers, and duties as are necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

To appoint or remove an executive head of any State agency or institution, the executive head of which is regularly selected by a State board or commission.

Such an acting executive head will serve during the following:

The physical or mental incapacity of the regular office holder, as determined by the Governor after such inquiry as the Governor deems appropriate.

The continued absence of the regular holder of the office.

A vacancy in the office pending selection of a new executive head.

An acting executive head of a State agency or institution appointed in accordance with this subdivision may perform any act and exercise any power which a regularly selected holder of such office could lawfully perform and exercise.

All powers granted to an acting executive head of a State agency or institution under this section shall expire immediately:

Upon the termination of the incapacity as determined by the Governor of the officer in whose stead the Governor acts;

Upon the return of the officer in whose stead the Governor acts; or

Upon the selection and qualification of a person to serve for the unexpired term, or the selection of an acting executive head of the agency or institution by the board or commission authorized to make such selection, and the person’s qualification.

To procure, by purchase, condemnation, seizure, or by other means to construct, lease, transport, store, maintain, renovate, or distribute materials and facilities for emergency management without regard to the limitation of any existing law.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the Governor by law, during a gubernatorially or legislatively declared state of emergency, if the Governor determines that local control of the emergency is insufficient to assure adequate protection for lives and property because (i) needed control cannot be imposed locally because local authorities responsible for preservation of the public peace have not enacted appropriate ordinances or issued appropriate declarations as authorized by

G.S. 166A-19.31

; (ii) local authorities have not taken implementing steps under such ordinances or declarations, if enacted or declared, for effectual control of the emergency that has arisen; (iii) the area in which the emergency exists has spread across local jurisdictional boundaries, and the legal control measures of the jurisdictions are conflicting or uncoordinated to the extent that efforts to protect life and property are, or unquestionably will be, severely hampered; or (iv) the scale of the emergency is so great that it exceeds the capability of local authorities to cope with it, the Governor has the following powers:

To impose by declaration prohibitions and restrictions in the emergency area. These prohibitions and restrictions may, in the Governor’s discretion, as appropriate to deal with the emergency, impose any of the types of prohibitions and restrictions enumerated in

G.S. 166A-19.31

(b), and may amend or rescind any prohibitions and restrictions imposed by local authorities. Prohibitions and restrictions imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall take effect in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 166A-19.31(d) and shall expire upon the earliest occurrence of either of the following: (i) the prohibition or restriction is terminated by the Governor or (ii) the state of emergency is terminated.

Give to all participating State and local agencies and officers such directions as may be necessary to assure coordination among them. These directions may include the designation of the officer or agency responsible for directing and controlling the participation of all public agencies and officers in the emergency. The Governor may make this designation in any manner which, in the Governor’s discretion, seems most likely to be effective. Any law enforcement officer participating in the control of a state of emergency in which the Governor is exercising control under this section shall have the same power and authority as a sheriff throughout the territory to which the law enforcement officer is assigned.

Violation. — Any person who violates any provision of a declaration or executive order issued pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor in accordance with

G.S. 14-288.20

A.

History.

Former G.S. 14-288.15; 1969, c. 869, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 197; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c). Former G.S. 166A-6; 1951, c. 1016, s. 4; 1955, c. 387, s. 4; 1959, c. 284, s. 2; c. 337, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, ss. 11, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 181(a); 1995, c. 509, s. 125; 2001-214, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-90, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2014-100, s. 14.7(i).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 166A-19.30

.

Cross References.

As to riots, civil disorders, and emergencies, see

G.S. 14-288.1

et seq.

§ 166A-19.30.
Additional powers of the Governor during state of emergency. [Effective January 1, 2023]

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the Governor by law, during a gubernatorially or legislatively declared state of emergency, the Governor shall have the following powers:

To utilize all available State resources as reasonably necessary to cope with an emergency, including the transfer and direction of personnel or functions of State agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency services.

To take such action and give such directions to State and local law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with the provisions of this Article and with the orders, rules, and regulations made pursuant thereto.

To take steps to assure that measures, including the installation of public utilities, are taken when necessary to qualify for temporary housing assistance from the federal government when that assistance is required to protect the public health, welfare, and safety.

Subject to the provisions of the State Constitution to relieve any public official having administrative responsibilities under this Article of such responsibilities for willful failure to obey an order, rule, or regulation adopted pursuant to this Article.

Through issuance of an executive order to waive requirements for an environmental document or permit issued under Articles 1, 4, and 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes for the repair, protection, safety enhancement, or replacement of a component of the State highway system that provides the sole road access to an incorporated municipality or an unincorporated inhabited area bordering the Atlantic Ocean or any coastal sound where bridge or road conditions as a result of the events leading to the declaration of the state of emergency pose a substantial risk to public health, safety, or welfare. The executive order shall list the duration of the waiver and the activities to which the waiver applies. For purposes of this subdivision, “coastal sound” shall have the definition set forth in

G.S. 113A-103

, and “replacement” shall not be interpreted to exclude a replacement that increases size or capacity or that is located in a different location than the component that is replaced.

During a gubernatorially or legislatively declared state of emergency, with the concurrence of the Council of State, the Governor has the following powers:

To direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the State, to prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation; and to control ingress and egress of an emergency area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein.

To establish a system of economic controls over all resources, materials, and services to include food, clothing, shelter, fuel, rents, and wages, including the administration and enforcement of any rationing, price freezing, or similar federal order or regulation.

To regulate and control the flow of vehicular and pedestrian traffic, the congregation of persons in public places or buildings, lights and noises of all kinds, and the maintenance, extension, and operation of public utility and transportation services and facilities.

To waive a provision of any regulation or ordinance of a State agency or a political subdivision which restricts the immediate relief of human suffering.

To perform and exercise such other functions, powers, and duties as are necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

To appoint or remove an executive head of any State agency or institution, the executive head of which is regularly selected by a State board or commission.

Such an acting executive head will serve during the following:

The physical or mental incapacity of the regular office holder, as determined by the Governor after such inquiry as the Governor deems appropriate.

The continued absence of the regular holder of the office.

A vacancy in the office pending selection of a new executive head.

An acting executive head of a State agency or institution appointed in accordance with this subdivision may perform any act and exercise any power which a regularly selected holder of such office could lawfully perform and exercise.

All powers granted to an acting executive head of a State agency or institution under this section shall expire immediately:

Upon the termination of the incapacity as determined by the Governor of the officer in whose stead the Governor acts;

Upon the return of the officer in whose stead the Governor acts; or

Upon the selection and qualification of a person to serve for the unexpired term, or the selection of an acting executive head of the agency or institution by the board or commission authorized to make such selection, and the person’s qualification.

To procure, by purchase, condemnation, seizure, or by other means to construct, lease, transport, store, maintain, renovate, or distribute materials and facilities for emergency management without regard to the limitation of any existing law.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the Governor by law, during a gubernatorially or legislatively declared state of emergency, if the Governor determines that local control of the emergency is insufficient to assure adequate protection for lives and property because (i) needed control cannot be imposed locally because local authorities responsible for preservation of the public peace have not enacted appropriate ordinances or issued appropriate declarations as authorized by

G.S. 166A-19.31

; (ii) local authorities have not taken implementing steps under such ordinances or declarations, if enacted or declared, for effectual control of the emergency that has arisen; (iii) the area in which the emergency exists has spread across local jurisdictional boundaries, and the legal control measures of the jurisdictions are conflicting or uncoordinated to the extent that efforts to protect life and property are, or unquestionably will be, severely hampered; or (iv) the scale of the emergency is so great that it exceeds the capability of local authorities to cope with it, the Governor has the following powers:

To impose by declaration prohibitions and restrictions in the emergency area. These prohibitions and restrictions may, in the Governor’s discretion, as appropriate to deal with the emergency, impose any of the types of prohibitions and restrictions enumerated in

G.S. 166A-19.31

(b), and may amend or rescind any prohibitions and restrictions imposed by local authorities. Prohibitions and restrictions imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall take effect in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 166A-19.31(d) and shall expire upon the earliest occurrence of either of the following: (i) the prohibition or restriction is terminated by the Governor or (ii) the state of emergency is terminated.

Give to all participating State and local agencies and officers such directions as may be necessary to assure coordination among them. These directions may include the designation of the officer or agency responsible for directing and controlling the participation of all public agencies and officers in the emergency. The Governor may make this designation in any manner which, in the Governor’s discretion, seems most likely to be effective. Any law enforcement officer participating in the control of a state of emergency in which the Governor is exercising control under this section shall have the same power and authority as a sheriff throughout the territory to which the law enforcement officer is assigned.

(c1)

(Effective January 1, 2023)

Upon exercise of any of the powers granted in subsection (c) of this section, the following shall apply:

(1)

The Governor shall notify the affected local authorities immediately upon exercising any of the powers and any extensions thereof.

(2)

In exercising any of the powers, notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the Governor shall obtain a concurrence of the Council of State.

The duration of the exercise of any power by the Governor shall expire in accordance with

G.S. 166A-19.20

.

Violation. — Any person who violates any provision of a declaration or executive order issued pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor in accordance with

G.S. 14-288.20

A.

History.

Former G.S. 14-288.15; 1969, c. 869, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 197; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c). Former G.S. 166A-6; 1951, c. 1016, s. 4; 1955, c. 387, s. 4; 1959, c. 284, s. 2; c. 337, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, ss. 11, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 181(a); 1995, c. 509, s. 125; 2001-214, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-90, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2014-100, s. 14.7(i); 2021-180, s. 19E.6(c).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 166A-19.30

.

Cross References.

As to riots, civil disorders, and emergencies, see

G.S. 14-288.1

et seq.